Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.09, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. School board member training. A member deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end receive training in school finance and management developed in consultation with the Minnesota School Boards Association and consistent with section 127A.19. The School Boards Association must make available to each newly elected school board member training in school finance and management consistent with section 127A.19 within 180 days of that member taking office. The program deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be developed in consultation with the department and appropriate representatives of higher education.new text begin A member who fails to complete the training within 180 days of taking office must not serve as an officer under section 123B.14 until the member has completed the training.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end